Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.060

Hearing.

(1) On the day fixed for the hearing, the county legislative authority shall proceed to consider the report of the engineer, together with any evidence for or objection against such vacation and abandonment. If the county road is found useful as a part of the county road system it shall not be vacated, but if it is not useful and the public will be benefited by the vacation, the county legislative authority may vacate the road or any portion thereof. Its decision shall be entered in the minutes of the hearing.

(2) As an alternative, the county legislative authority may appoint a hearing officer to conduct a public hearing to consider the report of the engineer and to take testimony and evidence relating to the proposed vacation. Following the hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare a record of the proceedings and a recommendation to the county legislative authority concerning the proposed vacation. Their decision shall be made at a regular or special public meeting of the county legislative authority.

[ 1985 c 369 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.87.060. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 51, part; RRS s 6450-51, part.]